Utah statutes.
75-7-204.   Trust proceedings -- Dismissal of matters relating to foreign
trusts.
(1) The court may not, over the objection of a party, entertain proceedings
under Section 75-7-201 involving a trust which:
(a)  is under the continuing supervision of a foreign court;
(b)  is registered in another state; or
(c)  has a fiduciary which transacts a major portion of its trust
administration in another state.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the court may entertain a proceeding
regarding any matter involving a trust if:
(a)  all appropriate parties could not be bound by litigation in the courts of
the other state; or
(b)  the interests of justice would be seriously impaired.
(3)  The court may condition a stay or dismissal of a proceeding on the
consent of any party to the jurisdiction of the courts of another state, or
the court may grant a continuance or enter any other appropriate order.
